Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 434.560 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 434.550 to 434.730, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Automated banking device" means any machine which when properly activated by a credit card, debit card or
personal identification code will perform any of the following services:
(a) Dispense money as a debit to the cardholder's savings or checking account;[ or]
(b) Print the cardholder's savings or checking account balances on a statement;[ or]
(c) Transfer funds between a cardholder's savings and checking account;[ or]
(d) Accept payments on a cardholder's loan;[ or]
(e) Dispense cash advances on an open end credit or a revolving charge agreement;[ or]
(f) Accept deposits to a customer's savings or checking account;[ or]
(g) Receive inquiries of verification of checks and dispense information which verifies that funds are
available to cover said checks; or
(h) Cause money to be transferred electronically from a cardholder's account to an account held by any
business, firm, retail merchant, corporation, or any other organization;
(2) "Cardholder" means:
(a) For a credit or debit card, the person or organization named on the face of a credit or debit card to
whom or for whose benefit the credit or debit card is issued by an issuer; or
(b) For a gift card, any person or organization to whom a physical or virtual gift card is issued through a
purchase, or who receives a gift card from a willing party;
(3) "Credit card" means any instrument or device, whether known as a credit card, credit plate, credit number or
by any other name, issued by an issuer for the use of the cardholder in obtaining money, goods, services or
anything else of value on credit;
(4) "Debit card" means any instrument or device, known by any name, issued with or without fee by an issuer for
the use of the cardholder in obtaining money, goods, services, and anything else of value, payment of which is
made against funds previously deposited by cardholder;
(5) "E.F.T. system" means an electronic funds transfer system whereby funds are transferred electronically from a
cardholder's account to any other account;
(6) "Expired credit card" means a credit card which is no longer valid because the term shown on it has expired;
(7) "Expired debit card" means a debit card which is no longer valid because the term shown on it has expired;
(8) "Face value" means the highest monetary value listed on a gift card or its packaging, or if no value is
listed, two hundred fifty dollars ($250);
(9) "Gift card" means a card, code, or device, whether activated or unactivated, that:
(a) Is issued on a prepaid basis primarily for personal, family, or household purposes in a specified
amount, regardless of whether that amount may be increased or reloaded in exchange for payment;
and
(b) May be redeemable upon presentation by a cardholder at a single merchant or group of merchants,
or at multiple unaffiliated merchants within a payment card network;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(10) "Gift card redemption information" means information unique to each gift card which allows the
cardholder to access, transfer, or spend the funds on that gift card;
(11) "Issuer" means the business organization or financial institution which issues a credit, [or ]debit, or gift card or
its duly authorized agent;
(12)[(9)] "Merchant" means an owner or operator of any retail mercantile establishment or any agent, employee,
lessee, consignee, officer, director, franchisee, or independent contractor of such owner or operator.
"Merchant" also means:
(a) A person who receives from an authorized user of a payment card, or someone the person believes to be
an authorized user, a payment card or information from a payment card, or what the person believes to
be a payment card or information from a payment card, as the instrument for obtaining, purchasing, or
receiving goods, services, money, or anything else of value from the person; or
(b) A person engaged in the business of selling gift cards to consumers;
(13)[(10)] "Participating party" means a business organization or financial institution, or any duly authorized agent
of such business organization or financial institution, which is obligated by contract to acquire from a person,
business organization, or financial institution providing money, goods, services or anything else of value, a
sales slip, sales draft, or other instrument evidencing a credit, [or ]debit, or gift card transaction and from
whom the issuer is obligated by contract to acquire or participate in such sales slip, sales draft or other
instrument;
(14)[(11)] "Payment card" means a credit card, charge card, debit card, or any other card that is issued to an
authorized card user and that allows the user to obtain, purchase, or receive goods, services, money, or
anything else of value from a merchant;
(15)[(12)] "Presentation or presents" means[as used herein shall be construed to define] those actions taken by a
cardholder or any person to introduce a credit or debit card into an automated banking device or merely
displaying or showing a credit, [or ]debit, or gift card to the issuer, a person or organization providing money,
goods, services, or anything else of value, or any other entity with intent to defraud;
(16)[(13)] "Receives" or "receiving" means acquiring possession or control of a credit or debit card;
(17)[(14)] "Reencoder" means an electronic device that places encoded information from the magnetic strip or
stripe of a payment card onto the magnetic strip or stripe of a different payment card;
(18)[(15)] "Revoked credit card" means a credit card which is no longer valid because permission to use it has
been suspended or terminated by the issuer;
(19)[(16)] "Revoked debit card" means a debit card which is no longer valid because permission to use it has been
suspended or terminated by the issuer; and
(20)[(17)] "Scanning device" means a scanner, reader, or any other electronic device that is used to access, read,
scan, obtain, memorize, or store, temporarily or permanently, information encoded on the magnetic strip or
stripe of a payment card.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 434.550 TO 434.730 IS CREATED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of gift card tampering when he or she intentionally manipulates a gift card’s packaging
or security features to access the gift card’s information without authorization and with the intention of
using the information to improperly access and utilize funds placed on the gift card by another.
(2) Gift card tampering is a Class D felony.
(3) This section shall not apply to tampering with an activated gift card with or without the consent of the
cardholder.
(4) Conduct which may constitute a violation of this section may be used to show a violation of KRS 506.120,
but a person shall not be convicted of a violation of this section and KRS 506.120.
Section 3. KRS 434.580 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A person who takes a credit, [or ]debit, or gift card from the person, possession, custody, or control of
another without the consent of the cardholder, [or of ]the issuer, or, for a gift card, the merchant, or
who, with knowledge that it has been so taken, receives the credit, [or ]debit, or gift card with intent to

CHAPTER 38 3
use it or to sell it or to transfer it to a person other than the issuer, [or ]the cardholder, or, for a gift card,
the merchant, is:[ guilty of a misdemeanor and is]
1. For a credit or debit card, subject to the penalties set forth in subsection (1) of KRS 434.730; or
2. For a gift card, subject to the penalties set forth in KRS 514.030 for the face value of the gift
card.
(b) Taking a credit, [or ]debit, or gift card without consent includes obtaining it by conduct defined or
known as statutory larceny, common-law larceny by trespassory taking, common-law larceny by trick,
embezzlement, or obtaining property by false pretenses, false promise, or extortion.
(2) A person who has in his or her possession or under his or her control two (2) or more credit, [or ]debit, or gift
cards which have been taken or obtained in violation of subsection (1) of this section is presumed to know that
the credit, [or ]debit, or gift cards have been so taken or obtained.
Section 4. KRS 434.650 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A person who, with intent to defraud the issuer, a participating party, a person[,] or organization
providing money, goods, services, or anything else of value, or any other person:
1. Uses for the purpose of obtaining money, goods, services, or anything else of value a credit or
debit card obtained or retained in violation of KRS 434.570 to 434.650, or any of such sections,
or a credit or debit card which he or she knows is forged, expired, or revoked;
2. Obtains money, goods, services, or anything else of value by representing without consent of the
cardholder that he or she is the holder of a specified card or by representing that he or she is the
holder of a card and such card has not in fact been issued;
3. Uses a credit or debit card obtained or retained in violation of KRS 434.570 to 434.650, or any of
such sections, or a credit or debit card which he or she knows is forged, expired, or revoked, as
authority or identification to cash or attempts to cash or otherwise negotiate or transfer a check or
other order for payment of money, whether or not negotiable, if said negotiation or transfer or
attempt to negotiate or transfer would constitute a crime under KRS 514.040 or 516.030;[ or]
4. Deposits into his or her account or any account, via an automated banking device, a false,
fictitious, forged, altered, or counterfeit check, draft, money order, or any other such document
not his or her lawful or legal property; or
5. Obtains a gift card or gift card redemption information from a cardholder, issuer, or merchant
by means of false or fraudulent pretenses, representations, or promises;
is guilty as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The penalty for violating paragraph (a) of this subsection is a Class B misdemeanor unless:
1. The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value obtained in violation of this
section over a six (6) month period is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but is less than one
thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor;
2. The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value obtained in violation of this
section over a six (6) month period is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more but is less than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000), in which case it is a Class D felony;
3. The person has three (3) or more convictions under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph within the
last five (5) years, in which case it is a Class D felony. The five (5) year period shall be measured
from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were
entered; or
4. The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value obtained in violation of this
section over a six (6) month period is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, in which case it is
a Class C felony.
(2) A person who receives money, goods, services, or anything else of value as a result of a false, fictitious,
forged, altered, or counterfeit check, draft, money order, or any other such document having been deposited
into an account via an automated banking device, knowing at the time of receipt of the money, goods, services,
or item of value that the document so deposited was false, fictitious, forged, altered, or counterfeit or that the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
above described deposited item was not his or her lawful or legal property, violates this subsection and is
subject to the penalties set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Knowledge of revocation shall be presumed to have been received by a cardholder four (4) days after it has
been mailed to him or her at the address set forth on the credit or debit card or at his or her last known address
by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and, if the address is more than five hundred (500)
miles from the place of mailing, by air mail. If the address is located outside the United States, Puerto Rico,
the Virgin Islands, the Canal Zone, and Canada, notice shall be presumed to have been received ten (10) days
after mailing by registered or certified mail.
Signed by Governor March 19, 2025.